Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 1

General Provisions

2-1-101. Short title.

This title may be cited as the “Election Code.”

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-101.

Cross-References. Municipal elections, title 6, ch. 53.

Supervision of elections by state guard prohibited, §58-1-402.

Law Reviews.

Changing Focus and Exposing a Solution: Using Section 2 of the Voting Rights Act to Defeat Tennessee's Voter Photo ID Law, (Emma Redden), 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 229 (2013).

Ethical Requirements for Judicial Candidates (Joe G. Riley), 26 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 12 (1990).

Rethinking the Right to Vote Under State Constitutions, 67 Vand. L. Rev. En Banc 189 (2014).

Shelby County and the End of History, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 357 (2013).

The Origins and Constitutionality of State Unit Voting in the Electoral College, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 2099 (2001).

The Realities of Electoral Reform, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 761 (2015).

The Right to Vote Under State Constitutions (Joshua A. Douglas), 67 Vand. L. Rev. 89 (2014).

Voting Squared: Quadratic Voting in Democratic Politics, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 441 (2015).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of requirements for ballot access by new political parties, OAG 99-121 (5/19/99).

The Tennessee Tribune qualifies as a “newspaper” and/or a “newspaper of general circulation” for purposes of publication of official notices, OAG 04-011 (2/03/04).

2-1-102. Purpose.

The purpose of this title is to regulate the conduct of all elections by the people so that:

The freedom and purity of the ballot are secured;

Voters are required to vote in the election precincts in which they reside, except as otherwise expressly permitted;

Internal improvement is promoted by providing a comprehensive and uniform procedure for elections; and

Maximum participation by all citizens in the electoral process is encouraged.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-102.

Cross-References. General assembly authorized to require voters to vote in the precinct where they reside, Tenn. Const., art. IV, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Suffrage and the State's Interest in Preventing Fraud — The Constitutionality of Tennessee's Photo Identification Requirement Under Strict Scrutiny, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 929 (2014).

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

2-1-103. Scope of title.

All elections for public office, for candidacy for public office, and on questions submitted to the people shall be conducted under this title.

Acts 1972 ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-103.

Attorney General Opinions. Election officials are bound by law to use the title “county mayors” and not “county executives” on primary and general election ballots for that office after July 1, 2003, OAG 03-096 (8/13/03).

Although the Tennessee Constitution does not prohibit persons under the age of 18 from voting in municipal elections, current Tennessee law prohibits persons under the age of 18 from voting in municipal elections. A municipality’s home rule status has no effect on the application of the suffrage clause to municipal elections or on the ability of the legislature to establish a statewide age requirement for voters. Accordingly, under current law, a municipality may not allow any person under the age of 18 to vote in a municipal election, regardless of whether the municipality has adopted home rule. OAG 18-29, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 28 (7/6/2018).

2-1-104. Title definitions.

In this title, unless a different meaning is clearly intended:

“Armed forces personnel” means members of the army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, environmental science services administration, and public health service of the United States or members of the merchant marine of the United States, and their spouses and dependents;

“Ballot” means either a piece of paper or the labeled face of a voting machine prepared by appropriate election officials for voters to use to cast their votes;

“Ballot box” means a container in which paper ballots are to be placed after being marked by voters;

“Ballot label” means a piece of paper, cardboard or other material which is placed in the ballot frames of a voting machine to make a ballot;

“Computerized county” means a county which utilizes a computerized voter registration system which has been approved by the coordinator of elections;

“County executive committee” means a political party's authoritative county body which is constituted either under the law or under the rules of the political party;

“Election” means a general election for which membership in a political party in order to participate therein is not required;

“Election officials” means the officers of elections, judges, voting machine operators, precinct and assistant precinct registrars, and inspectors appointed under this title;

“Federal election” means an election held to:

Nominate a political party's candidate for congress or its candidates for elector for president and vice president;

Determine the presidential preference of a political party's members; or

Choose a member of congress or electors for president and vice president;

“Mail” means first class United States mail, but any higher class of mail may be used when “mail” is specified;

“Majority party” means the political party whose members hold the largest number of seats in the combined houses of the general assembly;

“Minority party” means the political party whose members hold the second largest number of seats in the combined houses of the general assembly;

“Newspaper of general circulation” means a publication bearing a title or name, regularly issued at least as frequently as once a week for a definite price, having a second class mailing privilege, being not less than four (4) pages, published continuously during the immediately preceding one-year period, which is published for the dissemination of news of general interest and is circulated generally in the political subdivision in which it is published and in which notice is to be given. In any county where a publication fully complying with this definition does not exist, the state coordinator of elections is authorized to determine the appropriate publication to receive any required election notice. A newspaper which is not engaged in the distribution of news of general interest to the public, but which is primarily engaged in the distribution of news of interest to a particular group of citizens, is not a “newspaper of general circulation”;

“Political party” means an organization which nominates candidates for public office;

“Poll book” means the official record book of an election containing poll lists;

“Poll list” means the official list of the names of voters in an election. In computerized counties, such a list may consist of a computer printout of registered voters who voted in that election;

“Polling place” means the room or rooms where voters apply to vote and mark and cast their ballots;

“Precinct” means a geographic unit for the holding of elections having one (1) polling place;

“Primary election” means an election held for a political party for the purpose of allowing members of that party to select a nominee or nominees to appear on the general election ballot;

“Protective counter” means a voting machine counter which cannot be reset and which records the total number of movements of the operating lever of the machine;

“Public counter” means a voting machine counter which shows the total number of movements of the operating lever of the machine at any point in time during an election;

“Question” means a statement of a constitutional amendment or any other proposition submitted to the vote of the people;

“Recognized minor party” means any group or association that has successfully petitioned by filing with the coordinator of elections a petition which shall conform to requirements established by the coordinator of elections, but which must at a minimum bear the signatures of registered voters equal to at least two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the total number of votes cast for gubernatorial candidates in the most recent election of governor, and on each page of the petition, state its purpose, state its name, and contain the names of registered voters from a single county;

“Registered voter” means a qualified voter who has fulfilled the registration requirements of this title;

“Regular August election” means the election held on the first Thursday in August of every even-numbered year;

“Regular November election” means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in every even-numbered year;

“Resident” has the meaning given in §§ 2-2-102 and 2-2-122;

“State election” means an election held to:

Nominate a political party's candidates for state, county or district offices; or

Choose state, county or district officers;

“Statewide election” means an election held to nominate or to choose officers elected by or to submit a question to the voters of the entire state; and

“Statewide political party” means a political party at least one (1) of whose candidates for an office to be elected by voters of the entire state has received a number of votes equal to at least five percent (5%) of the total number of votes cast for gubernatorial candidates in the most recent election of governor.

Where any act or section of the Tennessee Code refers to chapters or sections of the former title 2 of the Tennessee Code, which was repealed effective January 15, 1973, such references are deemed references to the appropriate chapters or sections of this title.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, §§ 1, 5; 1973, ch. 327, § 1; 1975, ch. 72, § 5; T.C.A., § 2-104; Acts 1980, ch. 725, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 450, § 1; 1990, ch. 727, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 1108, § 2; 2010, ch. 612, § 6; 2011, ch. 257, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 301, § 5; 2016, ch. 1016, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1108, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Voter Confidence Act.”

Acts 2011, ch. 301, § 7 provided that nothing in the act, which deleted the definitions of “precinct-based optical scanner”, “top race”, “voter-verified paper ballot” and “voting system”, shall be construed as restricting or otherwise prohibiting the utilization of precinct-based optical scanners approved for use pursuant to title 2, chapter 9, and in use by a county election commission on May 27, 2011, or the replacement of such voting machines through lease or purchase with the approval of the state coordinator of elections.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment deleted “in the past four (4) calendar years” following “the entire state” in definition of “Statewide political party”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1016, § 2. April 28, 2016.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 12.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of requirements for ballot access by new political parties, OAG 99-121 (5/19/99).

“The West Tennessee Examiner” is not suitable for publication of official notices under the Election Code because it is a free publication, OAG 00-160 (10/17/00).

The “Tennessee Tribune” qualifies as a “newspaper” and/or a “newspaper of general circulation” for purposes of publication of official notices, OAG 01-095 (6/7/01).

The City Paper is a newspaper of general circulation for purposes of publishing statutorily required notices, other than those required under the Election Code, OAG 02-050 (4/17/02).

“The West Tennessee Examiner” is not suitable for publication of official notices under the Election Code, OAG 03-076 (6/20/03).

It is not the unauthorized practice of law for a court to develop form petitions and orders and to direct non-attorney members of the clerk's office to make petitions available for use by pro se litigants seeking to have their driving privileges restored, OAG 04-071 (4/21/04).

Newspaper of general circulation, OAG 05-149 (9/29/05).

Hamilton County Herald is a “newspaper” or a “newspaper of general circulation,” OAG 06-091 (5/16/06).

The “Commercial Appeal” qualifies as a “newspaper” or “newspaper of general circulation” for purposes of publication of official notices, OAG 06-127 (8/4/06).

“Chattanooga Times Free Press” as a “newspaper” and/or “newspaper of general circulation,” OAG 06-158 (10/9/06).

“Knoxville Journal” as “newspaper” and/or “newspaper of general circulation,” OAG 06-166 (11/9/06).

“The Murfreesboro Post” as a “newspaper” or “newspaper of general circulation,” OAG 07-062 (5/7/07).

“Rutherford County Reader” as “newspaper” and/or “newspaper of general circulation”, OAG 07-146 (10/19/07).

“The Tennessean” as a “newspaper” and/or a “newspaper of general circulation,” OAG 09-007 (1/26/09).

2-1-105. Voting eligibility.

Only qualified voters who are registered under this title may vote at elections in Tennessee.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-105.

Cross-References. Right to vote, Tenn. Const., art. IV, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Rethinking the Right to Vote Under State Constitutions, 67 Vand. L. Rev. En Banc 189 (2014).

The Origins and Constitutionality of State Unit Voting in the Electoral College, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 2099 (2001).

The Right to Vote Under State Constitutions (Joshua A. Douglas), 67 Vand. L. Rev. 89 (2014).

Attorney General Opinions. “Qualified voter” under city charter, OAG 99-077 (4/5/99).

Although the Tennessee Constitution does not prohibit persons under the age of 18 from voting in municipal elections, current Tennessee law prohibits persons under the age of 18 from voting in municipal elections. A municipality’s home rule status has no effect on the application of the suffrage clause to municipal elections or on the ability of the legislature to establish a statewide age requirement for voters. Accordingly, under current law, a municipality may not allow any person under the age of 18 to vote in a municipal election, regardless of whether the municipality has adopted home rule. OAG 18-29, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 28 (7/6/2018).

2-1-106. Absence from work allowed for voting.

Any person entitled to vote in an election held in this state may be absent from any service or employment on the day of the election for a reasonable period of time, not to exceed three (3) hours, necessary to vote during the time the polls are open in the county where the person is a resident.

A voter who is absent from work to vote in compliance with this section may not be subjected to any penalty or reduction in pay for such absence.

If the tour of duty of an employee begins three (3) or more hours after the opening of the polls or ends three (3) or more hours before the closing of the polls of the county where the employee is a resident, the employee may not take time off under this section.

The employer may specify the hours during which the employee may be absent. Application for such absence shall be made to the employer before twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the day before the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-106.

Cross-References. Exemption of national guard from duty on election day, §58-1-229.

2-1-107. Signer of petition — Address required.

Any person signing a petition required under this title, whether for nomination of a candidate, for a referendum or for any other purpose, shall include the address of such person's residence. The signer of a petition must include the address of such person's residence as shown on such person's voter registration card in order for that person's signature to be counted; provided, that if the address shown on the petition is within the precinct in which the person is registered but is not the address shown on the registration card, the signature shall be valid and shall be counted. In the event that the signer of a petition includes information on a nominating petition that exceeds the information contained on such person's voter registration card, the signature shall be counted if there is no conflict between them. If no street address is shown on the signer's voter registration card, that person's signature and address as shown on such person's voter registration card shall be sufficient. However, a street address shall be sufficient, and no apartment number shall be required.

Any person who signed a permanent registration card shall sign any petition signed under this title; provided, that any person who printed such person's name on such person's permanent registration card shall print the name on any petition signed under this title. However, failure to comply with the foregoing shall not operate to disqualify any nominating signature or candidate's signature.

A person's regular signature shall be accepted just as such person's legal signature would be accepted. For example, for the purposes of this section “Joe Public” shall be accepted just as “Joseph Q. Public” would be accepted.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-106; Acts 1981, ch. 478, § 2; 1988, ch. 933, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. The redistricting by a city of its council districts during the 75 day signature gathering period in T.C.A. §2-5-151(f)(2) has no effect on the requirements of §§2-5-151(e)(2) and2-1-107, OAG 01-100 (6/18/01).

2-1-108. Filing of required documents.

When any document is required to be filed by a date or time prescribed by this title, it shall be received by the officer or body with which it is to be filed by the date or time prescribed.

The document shall be prominently marked with the time and date of filing and a receipt showing the same information shall be given to the person filing the document.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-108.

2-1-109. Copies of documents — Certification.

Whenever copies or duplicates of documents, other than tally sheets and similar election return papers, are required, they shall be legible and may be made by any copying method, including photocopying, which is commonly used in business in this state for permanent records.

If copies or duplicates have to be certified, they shall be certified as true copies of the original either by a person who signed the original or by the person who made the copies. The person who certifies the copies or duplicates shall indicate the capacity in which such person is certifying.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-109.

2-1-110. Publication of notice by commission or board.

When a commission or board established under this title is required to publish any notice in a newspaper of general circulation:

It shall publish the notice, if possible, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which notice is to be given;

It shall publish the notice in as many newspapers of general circulation as may be necessary to give notice effectively to the qualified voters of the area in which notice is to be given; and

Notices that require the same time frame for publication may be combined for publication in a newspaper of general circulation.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-110; Acts 2004, ch. 480, § 1.

Cross-References. Newspaper of general circulation defined, §2-1-104.

2-1-111. Oath of administrators of election laws.

Each person charged with the administration of any part of the election laws of this state shall, before entering upon the performance of such duties, take the following oath:

“I do solemnly swear (affirm) that I will support the Constitution and laws of the United States and the Constitution and laws of the State of Tennessee, and that I will faithfully and impartially discharge the duties of my office.”

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-111.

Cross-References. Oaths of office, §§8-18-107 —8-18-114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 7.

2-1-112. Restrictions on commission or board membership or service as campaign manager or treasurer or election official.

An elected official or an employee of a municipal, county, state, or federal governmental body or agency shall not serve as a member of a county election commission.

A member of a county election commission shall not serve as the campaign manager or treasurer of any candidate's political campaign in a local, state, or federal election during the commissioner's term of office. A violation of this subdivision (a)(2) subjects the member to immediate removal from office by a majority vote of the state election commission. This subdivision (a)(2) does not prohibit a member of the county election commission from providing uncompensated advice on a one-on-one basis to a candidate or party officer, nor does it prohibit providing a financial contribution to a candidate or party organization.

A candidate in an election shall not act in connection with that election as a member of any board or commission established under this title or as an election official.

The following persons shall not serve as election officials:

An employee of a county or city who works directly under the supervision of an elected official who is on the ballot;

The spouse, parent, father-in-law, mother-in-law, child, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece of a candidate or declared write-in candidate to be voted for at the election in that precinct or district. This subdivision (b)(2) disqualifies a person whose relationship to the candidate is the result of birth, marriage, or adoption. This subdivision (b)(2) does not disqualify a person from serving as an election official if the candidate to whom the person is related is an unopposed candidate. For purposes of this subdivision (b)(2), an “unopposed candidate” includes an individual whose nomination to an office at a primary election is unopposed by any other candidate within the same political party; or

A member of a reserve unit of the United States army, air force, marine corps or navy, or a member of the national guard who is on active duty.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 538, § 1; 1979, ch. 304, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-112; Acts 1981, ch. 106, § 1; 1984, ch. 664, § 1; 2005, ch. 163, § 5; 2008, ch. 1051, § 1; 2013, ch. 146, §§ 1-3; 2020, ch. 655, § 3.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote this section, which read: “(a)(1) Neither an elected official nor an employee of a county, municipal or federal governmental body or agency or of an elected official may serve as a member of a county election commission or as a member of a county primary board or as an election official. No candidate in an election may act in connection with that election as a member of any board or commission established under this title or as an election official.“(2) No state employee may serve as a member of a county election commission or as a member of a county primary board.“(3) No member of a county election commission who is appointed to the commission after January 1, 2009, shall be the campaign manager or treasurer of any candidate's political campaign in a local, state or federal election during the commissioner's term of office. A violation of this subdivision (a)(3) subjects the member to immediate removal from office by a majority vote of the state election commission. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(3) shall be construed to prohibit a member of the county election commission from providing uncompensated advice on a one-on-one basis to a candidate or party officer, nor shall it prohibit providing a financial contribution to a candidate or party organization.”;“(b) (1) This section does not disqualify any person who is within its terms solely because the person is a notary public, or a member of a reserve unit of the United States army, air force, marine corps or navy, or a member of the national guard unless the person is a full-time employee or member of such reserve unit or the national guard, or unless the person is on active duty.“(2) This section does not disqualify any employee of a county or city school system who does not work directly under the supervision of an elected official.“(3) This section does not disqualify any person from service as an officer of elections, judge, machine operator, assistant precinct registrar or inspector because the person is a member of a reserve unit of the United States army, air force, marine corps or navy or the national guard except while the person is on active duty.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 655, § 7. April 2, 2020.

Cross-References. Qualifications of commissioners, §2-12-102.

State election commissioners prohibited from serving as political candidate's campaign manager or treasurer, §2-11-111.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §2-1-112(a) would not prohibit a city or county elected official from serving on the state election commission, OAG 02-117 (10/22/02).

T.C.A. §2-1-112(a) prohibits a candidate for election or reelection to a county or city office or for election to any other state or local office from serving as a member of the state election commission, OAG 02-117 (10/22/02).

A member of the county election commission may not serve as a member of the county civil service board, OAG 02-121 (10/30/02).

A quo warranto action appears to be the proper vehicle for challenging the qualifications of an individual. prohibited from serving by T.C.A. §2-1-112, OAG 05-049 (4/19/05).

In light of T.C.A. §2-1-112, an individual who works for county school board in an administrative, non-teacher capacity may not serve on a county election commission, OAG 05-049 (4/19/05).

Constitutionality of restriction on political activity of election commissioners, OAG 07-023 (3/1/07).

County election commissioner serving on county board of public utilities. OAG 13-77, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 78 (10/17/13).

2-1-113. Meetings of boards and commissions.

Boards and commissions established under this title shall meet on the call of their chair, or if there is no chair, of the oldest member of the body in age.

All meetings shall be open and subject to title 8, chapter 44.

With respect to meetings regularly scheduled by county election commissions or county primary boards, the public notice requirement of this section may be met by permanently posting in the commission office a conspicuous meeting notice. All notices shall state the time, place and purpose for which the meeting is called.

Official minutes of all meetings shall be kept in permanent form and shall include the vote of each member on all issues passed upon. Minutes shall be available to the public for examination at reasonable times.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for any board or commission established under this title. Action shall be taken by vote of the majority of the members of the board or commission present. Any action taken at a meeting which does not meet the requirements of this section is voidable at the request of any person who is adversely affected by the action.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-113; Acts 1980, ch. 609, § 2.

2-1-114. Requisites for political parties.

No political party may have nominees on a ballot or exercise any of the rights of political parties under this title until its officers have filed on its behalf with the secretary of state and with the coordinator of elections:

An affidavit under oath that it does not advocate the overthrow of local, state or national government by force or violence and that it is not affiliated with any organization which does advocate such a policy; and

A copy of the rules under which the party and its subdivisions operate. Copies of amendments or additions to the rules shall be filed with the secretary of state and with the coordinator of elections within thirty (30) days after they are adopted and shall be of no effect until ten (10) days after they are filed.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-114.

2-1-115. Computation of time.

The computation of time within which to do any act required by this title shall be in accordance with §1-3-102.

Acts 1979, ch. 306, § 4; T.C.A., § 2-115; Acts 1980, ch. 609, § 3; 1991, ch. 273, § 1.

2-1-116. Removal of campaign advertising.

After the conclusion of a primary, general, or special election, candidates in such election shall be responsible for the removal of any signs, posters, or placards advocating their candidacy, which have been placed on highway rights-of-way or other publicly owned property. The removal of such materials shall be accomplished within a reasonable period of time following the election, not to exceed three (3) weeks.

Any candidate in a primary election who will also be a candidate in a general or special election following that primary shall not be required to remove any signs advocating such candidate's candidacy until after the conclusion of the general or special election.

This section shall not be construed as being penal in nature. There shall be no punitive measures taken against a candidate or workers if all signs are not removed.

Acts 1983, ch. 197, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N.L. Resener, J.A. Whitson, K.J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

2-1-117. Newspaper of general circulation.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, in any municipality in any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000) according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in any municipality incorporated pursuant to title 6, chapter 18, having a population of not less than eleven thousand two hundred (11,200) nor more than eleven thousand three hundred (11,300) according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, which lies within both a county having a metropolitan form of government and a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000) according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census and a county having a population of not less than one hundred three thousand one hundred (103,100) nor more than one hundred three thousand four hundred (103,400) according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, for the purposes of this chapter a “newspaper of general circulation” includes a publication bearing a title or name, regularly issued at least as frequently as once a week for a definite price, having a third-class mailing privilege, being not less than four (4) pages, published continuously during the immediately preceding one-year period, which is published for the dissemination of news of general interest to the community which it serves, and is circulated generally in the municipality in which it is published and in which notice is to be given.

Acts 1993, ch. 507, § 1; 1994, ch. 898, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

2-1-118. Consolidated report on the Help America Vote Act requirements and payments.

The secretary of state shall file a copy of the previous year's consolidated report on the Help America Vote Act (HAVA) Title I, § 101, codified as 42 U.S.C. § 15301, funds and Title II, § 251, codified as 42 U.S.C. § 15401, requirements and payments to the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives, the fiscal review committee and the office of legislative budget analysis by February 1 of each year.

Acts 2010, ch. 947, § 1.

2-1-119. Monitoring of elections by U.N. representative.

Any representative of the United Nations appearing without a treaty ratified by the United States senate stating that the United Nations can monitor elections in this state, shall not monitor elections in this state.

Acts 2014, ch. 807, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 807, § 2. April 25, 2014.